North Dakota statutes. TITLE 47 Property
CHAPTER 47-30.2 Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act

Source:

S.L. 2021, sb2048, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-01.
(102) Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Administrator” means the administrator of the state abandoned property office.

“Administrator’s agent” means a person with which the commissioner contracts to conduct an examination under sections 47-30.2-54, 47-30.2-55, 47-30.2-56, 47-30.2-57, 47-30.2-58, 47-30.2-59, 47-30.2-60, 47-30.2-61, and 47-30.2-62 on behalf of the administrator. The term includes an independent contractor of the person and each individual participating in the examination on behalf of the person or contractor.

“Apparent owner” means a person whose name appears on the records of a holder as the owner of property held, issued, or owing by the holder.

“Board” means the board of university and school lands.

“Business association” means a corporation, joint stock company, investment company, partnership, unincorporated association, joint venture, limited liability company, business trust, trust company, land bank, safe deposit company, safekeeping depository, financial organization, insurance company, federally chartered entity, utility, sole proprietorship, or other business entity, whether or not for profit.

“Cashier’s check” means a check that:

Is purchased by a remitter and made payable to a designated payee;

Is signed by an officer or employee of the financial organization;

Authorizes payment of the amount shown on the check’s face to the payee;

Is a direct obligation of the financial organization; and

Is provided to a customer of the financial institution or acquired from the financial institution for remittance purposes.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of university and school lands.

“Confidential record” has the same meaning as defined in section 44-04-17.1.

“Department” means the department of trust lands.

“Domicile” means:

For a corporation, the state of its incorporation;

For a business association whose formation requires a filing with a state, other than a corporation, the state of its filing;

For a federally chartered entity, the state of its home office; and

For any other holder, the state of its principal place of business.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic mail” means a communication by electronic means, together with attachments, which is automatically retained and stored and may be readily accessed or retrieved.

“Financial organization” means a savings and loan association, building and loan association, savings bank, industrial bank, bank, banking organization, private banker, trust company, credit union, or an organization defined as a bank or banking organization under the laws of this state or of the United States.

“Game-related digital content” means digital content that exists only in an electronic game or electronic-game platform.

The term includes:

Game-play currency such as a virtual wallet, even if denominated in United States currency; and

The following if for use or redemption only within the game or platform or another electronic game or electronic-game platform:

Points sometimes referred to as gems, tokens, gold, and similar names; and

Digital codes; and

The term does not include an item that the issuer:

Permits to be redeemed for use outside a game or platform for:

Money; or

Goods or services that have more than minimal value; or

Otherwise monetizes for use outside a game or platform.

“Gift card” means a record that:

Is usable at:

A single merchant; or

A specified group of merchants;

Is prefunded before the record is used; and

Can be used for purchases of goods or services.

“Holder” means a person obligated to hold for the account of, or to deliver or pay to, the owner, property subject to this chapter.

“Insurance company” has the same meaning as defined in section 26.1-02-01, and also includes a benevolent society, nonprofit health service corporation, and a health maintenance organization.

“Loyalty card” means a record given without monetary consideration under an award, reward, benefit, loyalty, incentive, rebate, or promotional program which may be used or redeemed only to obtain goods or services or a discount on goods or services. The term does not include a record that may be redeemed for money or otherwise monetized by the issuer.

“Mineral proceeds” means an obligation:

To pay resulting from the production and sale of minerals, including net revenue interest, royalties, overriding royalties, production payments, and joint operating agreements; or

For the acquisition and retention of a mineral lease, including bonuses, delay rentals, shut-in royalties, and minimum royalties.

“Money order” means a payment order for a specified amount of money. The term includes an express money order and a personal money order on which the remitter is the purchaser.

“Municipal bond” means a bond or evidence of indebtedness issued by a municipality or other political subdivision of a state.

“Net card value” means the original purchase price or original issued value of a stored-value card, plus amounts added to the original price or value, minus amounts used and any service charge, fee, or dormancy charge permitted by law.

“Non-freely transferable security” means a security that cannot be delivered to the administrator by the depository trust clearing corporation or similar custodian of securities providing post-trade clearing and settlement services to financial markets or cannot be delivered because there is no agent to effect transfer. The term includes a worthless security.

“Owner” means a person that has a legal, beneficial, or equitable interest in property subject to this chapter or the person’s legal representative when acting on behalf of and in the best interest of the owner. The term includes:

A depositor, for a deposit;

A beneficiary, for a trust other than a deposit in trust;

A creditor, claimant, or payee, for other property; and

The lawful bearer of a record that may be used to obtain money, a reward, or a thing of value.

“Payroll card” means a record that evidences a payroll-card account that is directly or indirectly established through an employer and to which electronic fund transfers of the consumer’s wages, salary, or other employee compensation, such as commissions, are made on a recurring basis, whether the account is operated or managed by the employer, a third-party payroll processor, a depository institution, or any other person.

“Person” means an individual, estate, business association, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

“Property” means tangible property described in section 47-30.2-08 or a fixed and certain interest in intangible property held, issued, or owed in the course of a holder’s business or by a government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

The term includes:

All income from or increments to the property; and

Property referred to as or evidenced by:

Money, virtual currency, interest, or a dividend, check, draft, deposit, or payroll card;

A credit balance, customer’s overpayment, stored-value card, security deposit, refund, credit memorandum, unpaid wage, unused ticket for which the issuer has an obligation to provide a refund, mineral proceeds, or unidentified remittance;

A security except for:

A bond, debenture, note, or other evidence of indebtedness;

Money deposited to redeem a security, make a distribution, or pay a dividend;

An amount due and payable under an annuity contract or insurance policy;

An amount distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit-sharing, employee-savings, supplemental-unemployment insurance, or a similar benefit;

Intangible property and any income or increment derived from the intangible property held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another person;

Mineral proceeds; and

An in-store credit for returned merchandise.

The term does not include:

Property held in a plan described in Section 529 A of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, [26 U.S.C. 529 A];

Game-related digital content;

A loyalty card; or

A gift card.

“Putative holder” means a person believed by the administrator to be a holder, until the person pays or delivers to the administrator property subject to this chapter or the administrator or a court makes a final determination that the person is or is not a holder.

“Record” has the same meaning as defined in section 44-04-17.1.

“Security” means:

A security as defined in section 41-08-02;

A security entitlement as defined in section 41-08-02, including a customer security account held by a registered broker-dealer, to the extent the financial assets held in the security account are not:

Registered on the books of the issuer in the name of the person for which the broker-dealer holds the assets;

Payable to the order of the person; or

Specifically indorsed to the person; or

An equity interest in a business association not included in subdivision a or b.

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Stored-value card” means a card, code, or other device, including a merchandise credit or rebate card, which is:

Issued on a prepaid basis primarily for personal, family, or household purposes to a consumer in a specified amount, whether or not that amount may be increased or reloaded in exchange for payment;

Redeemable upon presentation at multiple unaffiliated merchants for goods or services or usable at automated teller machines; and

Not a gift card, payroll card, loyalty card, or game-related digital content.

“Utility” means a person that owns or operates for public use a plant, equipment, real property, franchise, or license for the following public services:

Transmission of communications or information;

Production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam, or gas; or

Provision of sewage or septic services, or trash, garbage, or recycling disposal.

“Virtual currency” means a digital representation of value used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or store of value, which does not have legal tender status recognized by the United States. The term does not include:

The software or protocols governing the transfer of the digital representation of value;

Game-related digital content; or

A loyalty card or gift card.

“Worthless security” means a security whose cost of liquidation and delivery to the administrator would exceed the value of the security on the date a report is due under this chapter.

(1)

A worthless security; or

(2)

A security that is subject to a lien, legal hold, or restriction evidenced on the records of the holder or imposed by operation of law, if the lien, legal hold, or restriction restricts the holder’s or owner’s ability to receive, transfer, sell, or otherwise negotiate the security;

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-02.
(103) Inapplicability to foreign transaction.

This chapter does not apply to property held, due, and owing in a foreign country if the transaction out of which the property arose was a foreign transaction.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-03.
(104) Rulemaking.

The commissioner may adopt rules to implement and administer this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-04.
(201) When property presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 47-30.2-12, the following property is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner during the period specified below:

Except as provided in this section, checks held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course of the holder’s business which remain uncashed by the owner two years after becoming payable;

A traveler’s check, fifteen years after issuance;

A money order, seven years after issuance;

A state or municipal bond, bearer bond, or original-issue-discount bond, three years after the earliest of the date:

The bond matures;

The bond is called; or

The obligation to pay the principal of the bond arises;

A debt of a business association, three years after the obligation to pay arises;

A payroll card or a demand, savings, or time deposit, including a time deposit that is automatically renewable, five years after the date of maturity of the time deposit or the date of the last indication of interest in the property by the apparent owner, whichever is earlier, provided a time deposit that is automatically renewable is deemed matured on its initial date of maturity unless the apparent owner has consented in a record on file with the holder to renewal at or about the time of the renewal. If an apparent owner has another established account with the financial institution and has demonstrated interest in any account under section 47-30.2-12, then all accounts must be considered active;

A cashier’s check or certified check, two years after issuance;

Money or a credit owed to a customer as a result of a retail business transaction, other than in-store credit for returned merchandise, three years after the obligation arose;

An amount owed by an insurance company on a life or endowment insurance policy or an annuity contract that has matured or terminated, three years after the obligation to pay arose under the terms of the policy or contract or, if a policy or contract for which an amount is owed on proof of death has not matured by proof of the death of the insured or annuitant, as follows:

With respect to an amount owed on a life or endowment insurance policy, three years after the earlier of the date:

The insurance company has knowledge of the death of the insured; or

The insured has attained, or would have attained if living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve for the policy is based; and

With respect to an amount owed on an annuity contract, three years after the date the insurance company has knowledge of the death of the annuitant.

Property distributable by a business association in the course of dissolution, one year after the property becomes distributable;

Property held by a court, including property received as proceeds of a class action, three years after the property becomes distributable;

Property held by a government or political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, including municipal bond interest and unredeemed principal under the administration of a paying agent or indenture trustee, three years after the property becomes distributable;

Wages, commissions, bonuses, or reimbursements to which an employee is entitled, or other compensation for personal services, one year after the amount becomes payable;

A deposit or refund owed to a subscriber by a utility, one year after the deposit or refund becomes payable;

A security deposit, including interest on the security deposit, made in advance by a person to secure an agreement for rights of services, less any lawsuit deductions, which remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after termination of the agreement for which the deposit or advance payment was made;

A sum payable as mineral proceeds which has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than three years after it became payable or distributable and the owner’s underlying right to receive those mineral proceeds are deemed abandoned. At the time an owner’s underlying right to receive mineral proceeds is deemed abandoned, any mineral proceeds then owing to the owner and any proceeds accruing after that time are deemed abandoned;

Property not specified in this section or sections 47-30.2-05 through 47-30.2-10, the earlier of three years after the owner first has a right to demand the property or the obligation to pay or distribute the property arises.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-05.
(202) When tax-deferred or tax-exempt retirement account presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 47-30.2-12, property held in a pension account or retirement account that qualifies for tax deferral or tax exemption under the income tax laws of the United States is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner three years after the later of:

The following dates:

Except as in paragraph 2, the date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service; or

If the second communication is sent later than thirty days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered by the United States postal service; or

The earlier of the following dates:

The date the apparent owner becomes seventy-two years of age, if determinable by the holder; or

If the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, [26 U.S.C. 1 et seq.] or title 57, requires distribution to avoid a tax penalty, two years after the date the holder:

Receives confirmation of the death of the apparent owner in the ordinary course of its business; or

Confirms the death of the apparent owner under subsection 2.

If a holder in the ordinary course of its business receives notice or an indication of the death of an apparent owner and subdivision b of subsection 1 applies, the holder shall attempt not later than ninety days after receipt of the notice or indication to confirm whether the apparent owner is deceased.

If the holder does not send communications to the apparent owner of an account described in subsection 1 by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the apparent owner’s interest in the property by sending the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication not later than two years after the apparent owner’s last indication of interest in the property. However, the holder promptly shall attempt to contact the apparent owner by first-class United States mail if:

The holder does not have information needed to send the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication;

The holder receives notification that the electronic-mail communication was not received; or

The apparent owner does not respond to the electronic-mail communication not later than thirty days after the communication was sent.

If first-class United States mail sent under subsection 3 is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service, the property is presumed abandoned three years after the later of:

Except as in subdivision b, the date a second consecutive communication to contact the apparent owner sent by first-class United States mail is returned to the holder undelivered;

If the second communication is sent later than thirty days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered; or

The date established by subdivision b of subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-06.
(203) When other tax-deferred or tax-exempt account presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 47-30.2-12 and except for property described in section 47-30.2-05 and property held in a plan described in Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, [26 U.S.C. 529A] property held in an account or plan, including a health savings account, that qualifies for tax deferral or tax exemption under the income tax laws of the United States is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner three years after the earlier of:

The date, if determinable by the holder, specified in the income tax laws and regulations of the United States by which distribution of the property must begin to avoid a tax penalty, with no distribution having been made; or

Thirty years after the date the account was opened.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-07.
(204) When custodial account for minor presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 47-30.2-12, property held in an account established under a state’s Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or Uniform Transfers to Minors Act is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by or on behalf of the minor on whose behalf the account was opened three years after the later of:

Except as in subdivision b, the date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the custodian of the minor on whose behalf the account was opened is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal service;

If the second communication is sent later than thirty days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered; or

The date on which the custodian of the minor, as defined under section 47-24.1-01, is required to transfer the property to the minor or the minor’s estate in accordance with the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or Uniform Transfers to Minors Act of the state in which the account was opened.

If the holder does not send communications to the custodian of the minor on whose behalf an account described in subsection 1 was opened by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the custodian of the minor’s interest in the property by sending the custodian of the minor an electronic-mail communication not later than two years after the custodian of the minor’s last indication of interest in the property. However, the holder promptly shall attempt to contact the custodian of the minor by first-class United States mail if:

The holder does not have information needed to send the custodian of the minor an electronic-mail communication or the holder believes that the custodian of the minor’s electronic-mail address in the holder’s records is not valid;

The holder receives notification that the electronic-mail communication was not received; or

The custodian of the minor does not respond to the electronic-mail communication not later than thirty days after the communication was sent.

If first-class United States mail sent under subsection 2 is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal service, the property is presumed abandoned three years after the later of:

The date a second consecutive communication to contact the custodian of the minor by first-class United States mail is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service; or

The date established by subdivision c of subsection 1.

The property in the account described in subsection 1 ceases to be subject to this section on the date the property is transferred to the minor or to the minor’s estate.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-08.
(205) When contents of safe deposit box presumed abandoned.

Tangible property held in a safe deposit box is presumed abandoned if the property remains unclaimed by the apparent owner three years after the earlier of the:

Expiration of the lease or rental period for the box; or

Earliest date when the lessor of the box is authorized by law of this state other than this chapter to enter the box and remove or dispose of the contents without consent or authorization of the lessee.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-09.
(206) When stored-value card presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 47-30.2-12, the net card value of a stored-value card, other than a payroll card, is presumed abandoned on the latest of three years after:

December thirty-first of the year in which the card is issued or additional funds are deposited into the card;

The most recent indication of interest in the card by the apparent owner; or

A verification or review of the balance by or on behalf of the apparent owner.

The amount presumed abandoned in a stored-value card is the net card value at the time it is presumed abandoned.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-10.
(208) When security presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 47-30.2-12, a security is presumed abandoned three years after:

The date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service; or

If the second communication is made later than thirty days after the first communication is returned, the date the first communication is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal service.

If the holder does not send communications to the apparent owner of a security by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the apparent owner’s interest in the security by sending the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication not later than two years after the apparent owner’s last indication of interest in the security. However, the holder promptly shall attempt to contact the apparent owner by first-class United States mail if:

The holder does not have information needed to send the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication or the holder believes that the apparent owner’s electronic-mail address in the holder’s records is not valid;

The holder receives notification that the electronic-mail communication was not received; or

The apparent owner does not respond to the electronic-mail communication not later than thirty days after the communication was sent.

If first-class United States mail sent under subsection 2 is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service, the security is presumed abandoned three years after the date the mail is returned.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-11.
(209) When related property presumed abandoned.

At and after the time property is presumed abandoned under this chapter, any other property right or interest accrued or accruing from the property and not previously presumed abandoned is also presumed abandoned.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-12.
(210) Indication of apparent owner interest in property.

The period after which property is presumed abandoned is measured from the later of:

The date the property is presumed abandoned under sections 47-30.2-04, 47-30.2-05, 47-30.2-06, 47-30.2-07, 47-30.2-08, 47-30.2-09, 47-30.2-10, 47-30.2-11, 47-30.2-12, 47-30.2-13, and 47-30.2-14; or

The latest indication of interest by the apparent owner in the property.

Under this chapter, an indication of an apparent owner’s interest in property includes:

A record communicated by the apparent owner to the holder or agent of the holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is held;

An oral communication by the apparent owner to the holder or agent of the holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is held, if the holder or its agent contemporaneously makes and preserves a record of the fact of the apparent owner’s communication;

Presentment of a check or other instrument of payment of a dividend, interest payment, or other distribution, or evidence of receipt of a distribution made by electronic or similar means, with respect to an account, underlying security, or interest in a business association;

Activity directed by an apparent owner in the account in which the property is held, including accessing the account or information concerning the account, or a direction by the apparent owner to increase, decrease, or otherwise change the amount or type of property held in the account;

A deposit into or withdrawal from an account at a financial organization, including an automatic deposit or withdrawal previously authorized by the apparent owner other than an automatic reinvestment of dividends or interest;

Subject to subsection 5, payment of a premium on an insurance policy; and

Any other action by the apparent owner which reasonably demonstrates to the holder that the apparent owner knows that the property exists.

An action by an agent or other legal representative of an apparent owner, other than the holder acting as the apparent owner’s agent, is presumed to be an action on behalf of the apparent owner.

A communication with an apparent owner by a person other than the holder or the holder’s representative is not an indication of interest in the property by the apparent owner unless a record of the communication evidences the apparent owner’s knowledge of a right to the property.

If the insured dies or the insured or beneficiary of an insurance policy otherwise becomes entitled to the proceeds before depletion of the cash surrender value of the policy by operation of an automatic-premium-loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in the policy, the operation does not prevent the policy from maturing or terminating.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-13.
(211) Knowledge of death of insured or annuitant.

In this section, “death master file” means the United States social security administration death master file or other database or service that is at least as comprehensive as the United States social security administration death master file for determining that an individual reportedly has died.

With respect to a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract for which an amount is owed on proof of death, but which has not matured by proof of death of the insured or annuitant, the company has knowledge of the death of an insured or annuitant when:

The company receives a death certificate or court order determining that the insured or annuitant has died;

Due diligence, performed as required under section 26.1-55-02 to maintain contact with the insured or annuitant or determine whether the insured or annuitant has died, validates the death of the insured or annuitant;

The company conducts a comparison for any purpose between a death master file and the names of some or all of the company’s insureds or annuitants, finds a match that provides notice that the insured or annuitant has died, and validates the death; or

The company:

Receives notice of the death of the insured or annuitant from an administrator, beneficiary, policy owner, relative of the insured, or trustee or from a personal representative, or other legal representative of the insured’s or annuitant’s estate; and

Validates the death of the insured or annuitant.

The following apply under this section:

A death master file match under subdivision c of subsection 2 occurs if the criteria for an exact or partial match are satisfied as provided by:

Law of this state other than this chapter, including chapter 26.1-55; or

A rule or policy adopted by the insurance commissioner;

The death master file match does not constitute proof of death for the purpose of submission to an insurance company of a claim by a beneficiary, annuitant, or owner of the policy or contract for an amount due under an insurance policy or annuity contract.

The death master file match or validation of the insured’s or annuitant’s death does not alter the requirements for a beneficiary, annuitant, or owner of the policy or contract to make a claim to receive proceeds under the terms of the policy or contract.

The company shall make a good-faith effort using available records and information to document the death of the insured or annuitant in accordance with the time frame specified in chapter 26.1-55-02.

This chapter does not affect the determination of the extent to which an insurance company before the effective date of this chapter had knowledge of the death of an insured or annuitant or was required to conduct a death master file comparison to determine whether amounts owed by the company on a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract were presumed abandoned or unclaimed.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-14.
(212) Deposit account for proceeds of insurance policy or annuity contract.

If proceeds payable under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract are deposited into an account with check or draft writing privileges for the beneficiary of the policy or contract and, under a supplementary contract not involving annuity benefits other than death benefits, the proceeds are retained by the insurance company or the financial organization where the account is held, the policy or contract includes the assets in the account.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-15.
(301) Address of apparent owner to establish priority.

In sections 47-30.2-15, 47-30.2-16, 47-30.2-17, 47-30.2-18, 47-30.2-19, and 47-30.2-20, the following apply:

The last-known address of an apparent owner is any description, code, or other indication of the location of the apparent owner which identifies the state, even if the description, code, or indication of location is not sufficient to direct the delivery of first-class United States mail to the apparent owner.

If the United States postal zip code associated with the apparent owner is for a post office located in this state, this state is deemed to be the state of the last-known address of the apparent owner unless other records associated with the apparent owner specifically identify the physical address of the apparent owner to be in another state.

If the address under subsection 2 is in another state, the other state is deemed to be the state of the last-known address of the apparent owner.

The address of the apparent owner of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract or its proceeds is presumed to be the address of the insured or annuitant if a person other than the insured or annuitant is entitled to the amount owed under the policy or contract and the address of the other person is not known by the insurance company and cannot be determined under section 47-30.2-16.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-16.
(302) Address of apparent owner in this state.

The administrator may take custody of property that is presumed abandoned, whether located in this state, another state, or a foreign country if:

The last-known address of the apparent owner in the records of the holder is in this state; or

The records of the holder do not reflect the identity or last-known address of the apparent owner, but the administrator has determined that the last-known address of the apparent owner is in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-17.
(303) If records show multiple addresses of apparent owner.

Except as in subsection 2, if records of a holder reflect multiple addresses for an apparent owner and this state is the state of the most recently recorded address, this state may take custody of property presumed abandoned, whether located in this state or another state.

If it appears from records of the holder that the most recently recorded address of the apparent owner under subsection 1 is a temporary address and this state is the state of the next most recently recorded address that is not a temporary address, this state may take custody of the property presumed abandoned.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-18.
(304) Holder domiciled in this state.

Except as in subsection 2 or section 47-30.2-16 or 47-30.2-17, the administrator may take custody of property presumed abandoned, whether located in this state, another state, or a foreign country, if the holder is domiciled in this state or is this state or a political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this state; and

Another state or foreign country is not entitled to the property because there is no last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property in the records of the holder; or

The state or foreign country of the last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property does not provide for custodial taking of the property.

Property is not subject to custody of the administrator under subsection 1 if the property is specifically exempt from custodial taking under the law of this state or the state or foreign country of the last-known address of the apparent owner.

If a holder’s state of domicile has changed since the time property was presumed abandoned, the holder’s state of domicile in this section is deemed to be the state where the holder was domiciled at the time the property was presumed abandoned.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-19.
(305) Custody if transaction took place in this state.

Except as in section 47-30.2-16, 47-30.2-17, or 47-30.2-18, the administrator may take custody of property presumed abandoned whether located in this state or another state if:

The transaction out of which the property arose took place in this state;

The holder is domiciled in a state that does not provide for the custodial taking of the property, except that if the property is specifically exempt from custodial taking under the law of the state of the holder’s domicile, the property is not subject to the custody of the administrator; and

The last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is unknown or in a state that does not provide for the custodial taking of the property, except that if the property is specifically exempt from custodial taking under the law of the state of the last-known address, the property is not subject to the custody of the administrator.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-20.
(306) Traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument.

The administrator may take custody of sums payable on a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument presumed abandoned to the extent permissible under 12 U.S.C. 2501 through 2503.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-21.
(401) Report required by holder.

A holder of property presumed abandoned and subject to the custody of the administrator shall report in a record to the administrator concerning the property.

A holder may contract with a third party to make the report required under subsection 1.

Whether or not a holder contracts with a third party under subsection 2, the holder is responsible:

To the administrator for the complete, accurate, and timely reporting of property presumed abandoned; and

For paying or delivering to the administrator property described in the report.

A holder may file a negative report if the holder does not have reportable property or safe deposit box contents.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.